Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,144
Quo warranto; disobedience of court order; liability; penalty.

Any person who, without good reason, refuses to obey any order of the court as provided in sections 25-21,121 to 25-21,148 shall be deemed guilty of a contempt of court, and shall be fined in any sum not exceeding five thousand dollars, and imprisoned in the county jail until he comply with said order, and shall be further liable for the damages resulting to any person on account of his refusal to obey such order.

R.S.1867, Code § 727, p. 519;

R.S.1913, § 8351;

C.S.1922, § 9303;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,135;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,144.